Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1125.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2487XC (1) 91 sb/js S.F. _____ Section 1. REPEAL. Section 724.31A, Code 2025, is repealed. 1 EXPLANATION 2 The inclusion of this explanation does not constitute agreement with 3 the explanationâs substance by the members of the general assembly. 4 This bill relates to the sharing of identifying information 5 of persons prohibited from acquiring a pistol or revolver by 6 court order. 7 Under current Code section 724.31A, when a court issues an 8 order or judgment that prohibits a person from acquiring a 9 pistol or revolver, the clerk of the district court forwards 10 information necessary to identify the person to the department 11 of public safety (department), which in turn forwards the 12 information to the federal bureau of investigation for the 13 sole purpose of inclusion in the national instant criminal 14 background check system database. The clerk of the district 15 court also notifies the person of the prohibitions imposed. 16 When a person is no longer prohibited from acquiring a pistol 17 or revolver, the person may send a written request to inform 18 the department. The department then must correct, modify, or 19 remove the personâs record in any database that the department 20 makes available to the national instant criminal background 21 check system and notify the United States department of justice 22 that the basis for such record being made available no longer 23 applies. 24 The bill repeals Code section 724.31A. 25 -1- LSB 2487XC (1) 91 sb/js 1/ 1